src/ueverb.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +V +1p +2p +3p +sg +pl +mInd +mSub +mCond +mImp +tFut +tPres +tImp +tPret +pastPart +Gerund ^GV1 ^GV2 ^GV3
LEXICON Root
acertar Verb1;
acrecentar Verb1;
alentar Verb1;
acertar Verb1;
apretar Verb1;
arrendar Verb1;
atravesar Verb1;
calentar Verb1;
cegar Verb1;
cerrar Verb1;
comenzar Verb1;
concertar Verb1;
confesar Verb1;
desconcertar Verb1;
desherbar Verb1;
desmembrar Verb1;
despertar Verb1;
desterrar Verb1;
empezar Verb1;
encomendar Verb1;
enmendar Verb1;
enterrar Verb1;
errar Verb1;
fregar Verb1;
gobernar Verb1;
helar Verb1;
invernar Verb1;
manifestar Verb1;
mentar Verb1;
merendar Verb1;
negar Verb1;
nevar Verb1;
pensar Verb1;
plegar Verb1;
quebrar Verb1;
recomendar Verb1;
regar Verb1;
renegar Verb1;
segar Verb1;
sembrar Verb1;
segar Verb1;
sembrar Verb1;
sentar Verb1;
serrar Verb1;
temblar Verb1;
tentar Verb1;
tropezar Verb1;

ascender Verb2;
atender Verb2;
defender Verb2;
descender Verb2;
encender Verb2;
entender Verb2;
heder Verb2;
hender Verb2;
perder Verb2;
querer Verb2;
tender Verb2;
verter Verb2;

!Verbs ending in ar
LEXICON Verb1
+V+1p+sg+tPres+mInd:^^^o #;
+V+2p+sg+tPres+mInd:^^^as #;
+V+3p+sg+tPres+mInd:^^^a #;
+V+3p+pl+tPres+mInd:^^^an #;


+V+1p+sg+tPres+mSub:^^^e #;
+V+2p+sg+tPres+mSub:^^^es #;
+V+3p+sg+tPres+mSub:^^^e #;
+V+3p+pl+tPres+mSub:^^^en #;


!Verbs ending in er
LEXICON Verb2
+V+1p+sg+tPres+mInd:^^^o #;
+V+2p+sg+tPres+mInd:^^^es #;
+V+3p+sg+tPres+mInd:^^^e #;
+V+3p+pl+tPres+mInd:^^^en #;


+V+1p+sg+tPres+mSub:^^^a #;
+V+2p+sg+tPres+mSub:^^^as #;
+V+3p+sg+tPres+mSub:^^^a #;
+V+3p+pl+tPres+mSub:^^^an #;
